Alaska statutes. The Constitution of the State of Alaska
Article III The Executive

Section 1. Executive Power.

The executive power of the State is vested in the governor.

Cross references. —

See notes to Alaska Const., art. VI, §§ 2, 3.

Administrative Code. —

For governor, see 6 AAC, part 8.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Vesting authority in the legislative Budget and Audit Committee to approve transfers between appropriation items violates the separation of powers doctrine and is an improper delegation of a legislative function to an interim committee. July 22, 1976 Op. Att’y Gen.

Section 13(3) of the 1976 budget bill, which authorized the Budget and Audit Committee to supervise the governor’s execution of the budget act, specifically over that portion of it which permitted him to transfer appropriation items constituted an encroachment on executive power and offended the Alaska Constitution. July 22, 1976 Op. Att’y Gen.

Section 2. Governor: Qualifications.

The governor shall be at least thirty years of age and a qualified voter of the State. He shall have been a resident of Alaska at least seven years immediately preceding his filing for office, and he shall have been a citizen of the United States for at least seven years.

Opinions of attorney general. —

There is no authority in the constitution for the legislature to change the qualifications for holding the office of governor; hence, a statute declaring a candidate defeated in the primary election ineligible to run in the general election is unconstitutional as it provides a change in the qualifications required for holding “constitutionally” created public offices. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 6.

Section 3. Election.

The governor shall be chosen by the qualified voters of the State at a general election. The candidate receiving the greatest number of votes shall be governor.

Collateral references. —

26 Am.Jur.2d, Elections, § 358 et seq; 38 Am.Jur.2d, Governor, § 2.

29 C.J.S., Elections, §§ 222 et seq.; 81A C.J.S., States, §§ 147, 148.

Section 4. Term of Office.

The term of office of the governor is four years, beginning at noon on the first Monday in December following his election and ending at noon on the first Monday in December four years later.

Section 5. Limit on Tenure.

No person who has been elected governor for two full successive terms shall be again eligible to hold that office until one full term has intervened.

Collateral references. —

38 Am.Jur.2d, Governor, § 2. 63C Am.Jur.2d, Public Officers and Employees, §§ 144 to 150.

Construction and effect of constitutional or statutory provision disqualifying one for public office because of previous tenure of office.
59 ALR2d 716.

Section 6. Dual Office Holding.

The governor shall not hold any other office or position of profit under the United States, the State, or its political subdivisions.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Neither a legislator nor the governor may sit as a regent of the University of Alaska while holding office. December 27, 1976 Op. Att’y Gen.

Section 7. Lieutenant Governor — Duties.

There shall be a lieutenant governor. He shall have the same qualifications as the governor and serve for the same term. He shall perform such duties as may be prescribed by law and as may be delegated to him by the governor.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment, effective October 10, 1970 (6th Legislature’s SJR 2 1970), substituted “lieutenant governor” for “secretary of state” in the first sentence.

Opinions of attorney general. —

There is no authority in the constitution for the legislature to change the qualifications for holding the office of secretary of state [now lieutenant governor]; hence, a statute declaring a candidate defeated in the primary election ineligible to run in the general election is unconstitutional as it provides a change in the qualifications required for holding “constitutionally” created public offices. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 6.

Section 8. Election.

The lieutenant governor shall be nominated in the manner provided by law for nominating candidates for other elective offices. In the general election the votes cast for a candidate for governor shall be considered as cast also for the candidate for lieutenant governor running jointly with him. The candidate whose name appears on the ballot jointly with that of the successful candidate for governor shall be elected lieutenant governor.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment, effective October 10, 1970 (6th Legislature’s SJR 2 (1970)), substituted “lieutenant governor” for “secretary of state” in the first, second and third sentences.

Section 9. Acting Governor.

In case of the temporary absence of the governor from office, the lieutenant governor shall serve as acting governor.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment, effective October 10, 1970 (6th Legislature’s SJR 2 (1970)), substituted “lieutenant governor” for “secretary of state.”

Section 10. Succession: Failure to Qualify.

If the governor-elect dies, resigns, or is disqualified, the lieutenant governor elected with him shall succeed to the office of governor for the full term. If the governor-elect fails to assume office for any other reason, the lieutenant governor elected with him shall serve as acting governor, and shall succeed to the office if the governor-elect does not assume his office within six months of the beginning of the term.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment, effective October 10, 1970 (6th Legislature’s SJR 2 (1970)), substituted “lieutenant governor” for “secretary of state” in the first and second sentences.

Collateral references. —

38 Am.Jur.2d, Governor, §§ 11 to 13.

81A C.J.S., States, §§ 169 to 174.

Section 11. Vacancy.

In case of a vacancy in the office of governor for any reason, the lieutenant governor shall succeed to the office for the remainder of the term.

Cross references. —

For succession in office, see AS

44.19.042

; for special election in case of second vacancy in office of governor, see AS

44.19.044

; for simultaneous vacancies, see AS

44.19.046

.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment, effective October 10, 1970 (6th Legislature’s SJR 2 (1970)), substituted “lieutenant governor” for “secretary of state.”

Collateral references. —

38 Am.Jur.2d, Governor, §§ 11 to 13.

81A C.J.S., States, §§ 169 to 174.

Section 12. Absence.

Whenever for a period of six months, a governor has been continuously absent from office or has been unable to discharge the duties of his office by reason of mental or physical disability, the office shall be deemed vacant. The procedure for determining absence and disability shall be prescribed by law.

Cross references. —

For succession in office, see AS

44.19.042

; for special election in case of second vacancy in office of governor, see AS

44.19.044

; for simultaneous vacancies, see AS

44.19.046

.

Collateral references. —

38 Am.Jur.2d, Governor, §§ 12, 13.

81A C.J.S., States, §§ 169 to 174.

Section 13. Further Succession.

Provision shall be made by law for succession to the office of governor and for an acting governor in the event that the lieutenant governor is unable to succeed to the office or act as governor. No election of a lieutenant governor shall be held except at the time of electing a governor.

Cross references. —

For succession in office, see AS

44.19.042

; for special election in case of second vacancy in office of governor, see AS

44.19.044

; for simultaneous vacancies, see AS

44.19.046

.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment, effective October 10, 1970 (6th Legislature’s SJR 2 (1970)), substituted “lieutenant governor” for “secretary of state” in the first and second sentences.

Section 14. Title and Authority.

When the lieutenant governor succeeds to the office of governor, he shall have the title, powers, duties and emoluments of that office.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment, effective October 10, 1970 (6th Legislature’s SJR 2 (1970)), substituted “lieutenant governor” for “secretary of state.”

Section 15. Compensation.

The compensation of the governor and the lieutenant governor shall be prescribed by law and shall not be diminished during their term of office, unless by general law applying to all salaried officers of the State.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment, effective October 10, 1970 (6th Legislature’s SJR 2 (1970)), substituted “lieutenant governor” for “secretary of state.”

Section 16. Governor’s Authority.

The governor shall be responsible for the faithful execution of the laws. He may, by appropriate court action or proceeding brought in the name of the State, enforce compliance with any constitutional or legislative mandate, or restrain violation of any constitutional or legislative power, duty, or right by any officer, department, or agency of the State or any of its political subdivisions. This authority shall not be construed to authorize any action or proceeding against the legislature.

Section 17. Convening Legislature.

Whenever the governor considers it in the public interest, he may convene the legislature, either house, or the two houses in joint session.

Section 18. Messages to Legislature.

The governor shall, at the beginning of each session, and may at other times, give the legislature information concerning the affairs of the State and recommend the measures he considers necessary.

Section 19. Military Authority.

The governor is commander-in-chief of the armed forces of the State. He may call out these forces to execute the laws, suppress or prevent insurrection or lawless violence, or repel invasion. The governor, as provided by law, shall appoint all general and flag officers of the armed forces of the State, subject to confirmation by a majority of the members of the legislature in joint session. He shall appoint and commission all other officers.

Section 20. Martial Law.

The governor may proclaim martial law when the public safety requires it in case of rebellion or actual or imminent invasion. Martial law shall not continue for longer than twenty days without the approval of a majority of the members of the legislature in joint session.

Section 21. Executive Clemency.

Subject to procedure prescribed by law, the governor may grant pardons, commutations, and reprieves, and may suspend and remit fines and forfeitures. This power shall not extend to impeachment. A parole system shall be provided by law.

Cross references. —

For statutory provisions related to remission of sentences, executive pardons and clemency, see AS 33.20. For statutory provisions related to parole, see AS 33.16.

Section 22. Executive Branch.

All executive and administrative offices, departments, and agencies of the state government and their respective functions, powers, and duties shall be allocated by law among and within not more than twenty principal departments, so as to group them as far as practicable according to major purposes. Regulatory, quasi-judicial, and temporary agencies may be established by law and need not be allocated within a principal department.

Cross references. —

For definition of phrase “by law,” see Alaska Const., art. XII, § 11.

Opinions of attorney general. —

This section requires only that governmental functions be grouped among principal departments according to major purposes as far as practicable and could not be read to prohibit the Department of Fish and Game from performing an enforcement function complementary to that of the Department of Public Safety. March 29, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

Section 23. Reorganization.

The governor may make changes in the organization of the executive branch or in the assignment of functions among its units which he considers necessary for efficient administration. Where these changes require the force of law, they shall be set forth in executive orders. The legislature shall have sixty days of a regular session, or a full session if of shorter duration, to disapprove these executive orders. Unless disapproved by resolution concurred in by a majority of the members in joint session, these orders become effective at a date thereafter to be designated by the governor.

Section 24. Supervision.

Each principal department shall be under the supervision of the governor.

Administrative Code. —

For governor, see 6 AAC, part 8.

Section 25. Department Heads.

The head of each principal department shall be a single executive unless otherwise provided by law. He shall be appointed by the governor, subject to confirmation by a majority of the members of the legislature in joint session, and shall serve at the pleasure of the governor, except as otherwise provided in this article with respect to the secretary of state. The heads of all principal departments shall be citizens of the United States.

Revisor’s notes. —

Senate Joint Resolution No. 2, “changing the name of the secretary of state to lieutenant governor” in 16 sections of the Alaska Constitution, effective October 10, 1970, inadvertently omitted express amendment of this section.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Neither custom nor law requires the governor to submit the names of the heads of principal departments to the legislature for confirmation when they carry over in office following a gubernatorial election. January 25, 1979 Op. Att’y Gen.

Section 26. Boards and Commissions.

When a board or commission is at the head of a principal department or a regulatory or quasi-judicial agency, its members shall be appointed by the governor, subject to confirmation by a majority of the members of the legislature in joint session, and may be removed as provided by law. They shall be citizens of the United States. The board or commission may appoint a principal executive officer when authorized by law, but the appointment shall be subject to the approval of the governor.

Editor’s notes. —

The amendments proposed by 1980 Legislative Resolve 43 (CSHJR 20 am) (appointment and confirmation of board members) and 2000 Legislative Resolve 54 (CCS SJR 34) (public corporations) were rejected by voters.

Section 27. Recess Appointments.

The governor may make appointments to fill vacancies occurring during a recess of the legislature, in offices requiring confirmation by the legislature. The duration of such appointments shall be prescribed by law.